nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Klatring > Beskyttelsesenheter for klatring: Klatrebolter og ankere; Klatrekammer; Klatrehekser; Kiler til klatring; Pitonger og kroker til klatring; Riggplater og svivler
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Скалолазание > Устройства для защиты от падения: Шлямбуры и анкеры для скалолазания; Френды (камалоты); Гексы для альпинизма; Закладки и стопперы; Скальные крючья; Такелажные пластины и вертлюги
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Arrampicata > Dispositivi di protezione da arrampicata: Spit e ancoraggi da arrampicata; Friend da arrampicata; Dadi esagonali da arrampicata; Nut e stopper da arrampicata; Chiodi e ganci da arrampicata; Piastre di ancoraggio e girelli
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Klimmen > Beschermende apparatuur voor klimmen: Klimhaken en -ankers; Klim-cams; Klimhexen; Klimnuts en -stoppers; Klimrotspennen en -haken; Rigging-platen en -swivels
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Alpinismo > Dispositivos de proteção para alpinismo: Chapeletas e ancoragens de escalada; Cams de escalada; Hexêntricos de escalada; Nuts e entaladores de escalada; Pitons e ganchos de escalada; Placas de ancoragem e distorcedores de escalada
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Катерене > Устройства за защита при алпинизъм: Катерачни болтове и анкери; Френдове за катерене; Хексцентрици за катерене; Клинове и стопери за катерене; Клинове и куки за катерене; Текелажни плочи и въртящи механизми
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Laipiojimas > Saugos įtaisai: Laipiojimo varžtai ir inkarai; Laipiojimo kumšteliniai įtaisai; Laipiojimo šešiakampiai; Laipiojimo pleištai ir kamščiai; Laipiojimo pitonai ir kabliai; Takelažo plokštės ir sukamieji sujungimai
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Horolezectvo > Horolezecké ochranné pomôcky: Horolezecké skrutky a kotvy; Samosvorný lanový blok na lezenie; Hexcentrické istiace vklínence; Lezecké matice a zátky; Lezecké skoby a háky; Upevňovacie dosky a otočné karabíny
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 攀岩用品 > 攀岩保护装置: 攀岩挂片与锚点; 攀岩机械塞; 攀岩六角岩石塞; 攀岩岩石塞与止坠器; 攀岩岩钉与岩石钩; 分力板与旋转环
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Escalade > Dispositifs de protection pour l'escalade: Pitons et amarrages d’escalade; Coinceurs mécaniques d’escalade; Câblés hexagonaux d’escalade; Câblés et bicoins d’escalade; Pitons et crochets d’escalade; Plaques de répartition et émerillons
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Kiipeily > Kiipeilyn turvavälineet: Kiipeilypultit ja ankkurit; Kiipeilyn kevätkiilat; Kiipeilyheksat; Kiipeilykiilat ja stopperit; Kiipeilyhakat ja koukut; Jakolevyt ja leikarit
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Penjanje > Uređaji za zaštitu od penjanja: Vijci i sidra za penjanje; Kamere za penjanje; Umetci u obliku heksagona za penjanje; Matice i čepovi za penjanje; Klinovi i kuke za penjanje; Ploče za sidrenje i okretnice
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Tırmanış > Tırmanış Koruyucu Aygıtları: Tırmanış boltları ve ankrajları; Tırmanış yaylı takozları; Tırmanış heksleri; Tırmanış takozları ve stoperleri; Tırmanış sikkeleri ve kancaları; Ankraj plakaları ve fırdöndüler
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plezanje > Varovalna oprema za plezanje: Plezalni svedrovci in sidra; Zatiči za plezanje; Šestkotni zatiči za plezanje; Plezalne zagozde in zatiči; Plezalni klini in kavlji; Plošče in tečaji za pritrdišča
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Climbing > Climbing Protection Devices: Climbing Bolts & Anchors; Climbing Cams; Climbing Hexes; Climbing Nuts & Stoppers; Climbing Pitons & Hooks; Rigging Plates & Swivels
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Αναρρίχηση > Συσκευές προστασίας αναρρίχησης: Βύσματα και αγκύρια αναρρίχησης; Φρενάκια (cams) αναρρίχησης; Εξάγωνα αναρρίχησης; Καρύδια (nuts) αναρρίχησης; Καρφιά (pitons) και άγκιστρα αναρρίχησης; Πλάκες πολλαπλών αγκυρώσεων (rigging plates) και στριφτάρια
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > クライミング > 登山用安全装置: クライミング用ボルト・アンカー; クライミング用キャメロット; クライミング用ヘキセントリック; クライミング用ナッツ・ストッパー; クライミング用ハーケン; リギングプレート・スイベル
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Klatring > Klatrebeskyttelse: Bolte og ankre til klatring; Kamsikringer til klatring; Hexes til klatring; Kiler og stoppere til klatring; Klippesøm og kroge til klatring; Fordelingsplader og svirvler
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 등반 > 등산용 보호 장비: 클라이밍 볼트 및 앵커; 클라이밍 캠; 클라이밍 헥스; 클라이밍 너트 및 스토퍼; 클라이밍 피톤 및 훅; 리깅 플레이트 및 스위블
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Escalada > Dispositivos de protección de escalada: Chapas y anclajes de escalada; Empotradores mecánicos de escalada; Fisureros hexagonales de escalada; Fisureros y empotradores de escalada; Clavos y ganchos de escalada; Placas multianclaje y eslabones giratorios
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lezectví > Lezecké ochranné vybavení: Horolezecké nýty a kotvy; Horolezecké friendy; Horolezecké hexy; Horolezecké vklíněnce a stopery; Horolezecké skoby a háčky; Kotevní desky a obrtlíky
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Wspinaczka > Ochraniacze wspinaczkowe: Spity i kotwy wspinaczkowe; Friendy wspinaczkowe; Heksy wspinaczkowe; Kości wspinaczkowe; Haki wspinaczkowe; Płytki stanowiskowe i krętliki
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Escalada > Dispositivos de proteção para escalada: Chumbadouros e âncoras de escalada; Entaladores mecânicos de escalada; Hexes de escalada; Entaladores e stoppers de escalada; Pitões e ganchos de escalada; Placas de amarração e destorcedores
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปีนเขา > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับปีนเขา: โบลท์และจุดยึดปีนหน้าผา; แคมปีนหน้าผา; เฮ็กซ์ปีนหน้าผา; น็อตและสต็อปเปอร์ปีนหน้าผา; หมุดและตะขอปีนหน้าผา; แผ่นกระจายน้ำหนักและห่วงหมุน
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Mászás > Hegymászó védőeszközök: Mászó rögzítők és horgonyok; Mászó rugós ékek (cam); Mászó hexák; Mászó ékek; Sziklaszegek és mászókampók; Teherelosztó lapok és forgószemek
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Alpinism > Dispozitive de protecție pentru alpinism: Buloane și ancore de alpinism; Came pentru cățărare; Hexuri de alpinism; Nuci și stopere de alpinism; Pitoane și cârlige de alpinism; Plăci de multiplicare și vârtejuri
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Klettern > Kletterschutzausrüstung: Bohrhaken & Anker; Klemmgeräte; Hexentrics; Klemmkeile; Felshaken & Kletterhaken; Riggingplatten & Wirbel
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Leo núi > Thiết bị bảo hộ an toàn leo núi: Bu lông và mỏ neo leo núi; Chèn đá có cam; Chèn đá hình lục giác; Chèn đá và nút chặn leo núi; Đinh móc và móc leo núi; Bản mã và khớp xoay leo núi
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 攀爬運動 > 攀岩護具: 攀岩膨脹螺栓與固定點; 攀岩凸輪; 攀岩六角岩楔; 攀岩岩楔與阻擋器; 攀岩岩釘與掛鉤; 分力盤與萬向轉環
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Klättring > Enheter för klättringsskydd: Klätterbultar och ankare; Kamsäkringar för klättring; Hexor för klättring; Kilar och stoppers för klättring; Pitonger och krokar för klättring; Riggplattor och svirvlar